Illinois, session 104th, HB5551.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 52-3.33, 2-3.84, 14-7.03, and 21B-70 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.33)  (from Ch. 122, par. 2-3.33)7    Sec. 2-3.33. Recomputation of claims. To recompute within 83 years from the final date for filing of a claim any claim for 9general State aid reimbursement to any school district and to 10recompute and adjust any such claims within 6 years from the 11final date for filing, through and ending with Fiscal Year 122026, when there has been an adverse court or administrative 13agency decision on the merits affecting the tax revenues of 14the school district. However, no such adjustment shall be made 15regarding equalized assessed valuation unless the district's 16equalized assessed valuation is changed by greater than 17$250,000 or 2%. Any adjustments for claims recomputed for the 182016-2017 school year and prior school years shall be applied 19to the apportionment of evidence-based funding in Section 2018-8.15 of this Code beginning in the 2017-2018 school year 21and thereafter. However, the recomputation of a claim for 22evidence-based funding for a school district shall not require 23the recomputation of claims for all districts, and the State   HB5551 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 20609 LNS 34101 b1Board of Education shall only make recomputations of 2evidence-based funding for those districts where an adjustment 3is required, through and ending with Fiscal Year 2026. The 4State Board is authorized to and shall apply corrections to 5data used in evidence-based funding calculations that may 6result in current year adjustments and shall recover funds 7previously scheduled to be distributed or previously 8distributed to an Organizational Unit or specially funded unit 9during a fiscal year in accordance with Section 18-8.15 of 10this Code. 11    Except in the case of an adverse court or administrative 12agency decision, no recomputation of a State aid claim shall 13be made pursuant to this Section as a result of a reduction in 14the assessed valuation of a school district from the assessed 15valuation of the district reported to the State Board of 16Education by the Department of Revenue under Section 18-8.05 17or 18-8.15 of this Code unless the requirements of Section 1816-15 of the Property Tax Code and Section 2-3.84 of this Code 19are complied with in all respects. 20    This paragraph applies to all requests for recomputation 21of a general State aid or evidence-based funding claim 22received after June 30, 2003 and before July 1, 2026. In 23recomputing a general State aid or evidence-based funding 24claim that was originally calculated using an extension 25limitation equalized assessed valuation under paragraph (3) of 26subsection (G) of Section 18-8.05 of this Code or Section   HB5551 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 20609 LNS 34101 b118-8.15 of this Code, a qualifying reduction in equalized 2assessed valuation shall be deducted from the extension 3limitation equalized assessed valuation that was used in 4calculating the original claim.5    From the total amount of general State aid or 6evidence-based funding to be provided to districts, 7adjustments as a result of recomputation under this Section 8together with adjustments under Section 2-3.84 must not exceed 9$25 million, in the aggregate for all districts under both 10Sections combined, of the general State aid or evidence-based 11funding appropriation in any fiscal year; if necessary, 12amounts shall be prorated among districts. If it is necessary 13to prorate claims under this paragraph, then that portion of 14each prorated claim that is approved but not paid in the 15current fiscal year may be resubmitted as a valid claim in the 16following fiscal year. 17(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22.) 18    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.84)  (from Ch. 122, par. 2-3.84)19    Sec. 2-3.84. In calculating the amount of State aid to be 20apportioned to the various school districts in this State, the 21State Board of Education shall incorporate and deduct the 22total aggregate adjustments to assessments made by the State 23Property Tax Appeal Board or Cook County Board of Appeals, as 24reported pursuant to Section 16-15 of the Property Tax Code or 25Section 129.1 of the Revenue Act of 1939 by the Department of   HB5551 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 20609 LNS 34101 b1Revenue, from the equalized assessed valuation that is 2otherwise to be utilized in the initial calculation for 3adjustments reported through Fiscal Year 2026.4    From the total amount of general State aid or 5evidence-based funding to be provided to districts for 6adjustments reported through Fiscal Year 2026, adjustments 7under this Section together with adjustments as a result of 8recomputation under Section 2-3.33 must not exceed $25 9million, in the aggregate for all districts under both 10Sections combined, of the general State aid or evidence-based 11funding appropriation in any fiscal year; if necessary, 12amounts shall be prorated among districts. If it is necessary 13to prorate claims under this paragraph, then that portion of 14each prorated claim that is approved but not paid in the 15current fiscal year may be resubmitted as a valid claim in the 16following fiscal year. 17(Source: P.A. 100-465, eff. 8-31-17.) 18    (105 ILCS 5/14-7.03)  (from Ch. 122, par. 14-7.03)19    Sec. 14-7.03. Special education classes for children from 20orphanages, foster family homes, children's homes, or State 21residential units. If a school district maintains special 22education classes on the site of orphanages and children's 23homes, or if children from the orphanages, children's homes, 24foster family homes, other State agencies, or State 25residential units for children attend classes for children   HB5551 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 20609 LNS 34101 b1with disabilities in which the school district is a 2participating member of a joint agreement, or if the children 3from the orphanages, children's homes, foster family homes, 4other State agencies, or State residential units attend 5classes for the children with disabilities maintained by the 6school district, then reimbursement shall be paid to eligible 7districts in accordance with the provisions of this Section by 8the Comptroller as directed by the State Superintendent of 9Education. 10    The amount of tuition for such children shall be 11determined by the actual cost of maintaining such classes, 12using the per capita cost formula set forth in Section 1314-7.01, such program and cost to be pre-approved by the State 14Superintendent of Education. 15    If a school district makes a claim for reimbursement under 16Section 18-3 of this Code it shall not include in any claim 17filed under this Section a claim for such children. Payments 18authorized by law, including State or federal grants for 19education of children included in this Section, shall be 20deducted in determining the tuition amount. 21    Nothing in this Code shall be construed so as to prohibit 22reimbursement for the tuition of children placed in for profit 23facilities. Private facilities shall provide adequate space at 24the facility for special education classes provided by a 25school district or joint agreement for children with 26disabilities who are residents of the facility at no cost to   HB5551 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 20609 LNS 34101 b1the school district or joint agreement upon request of the 2school district or joint agreement. If such a private facility 3provides space at no cost to the district or joint agreement 4for special education classes provided to children with 5disabilities who are residents of the facility, the district 6or joint agreement shall not include any costs for the use of 7those facilities in its claim for reimbursement. 8    Reimbursement for tuition may include the cost of 9providing summer school programs for children with severe and 10profound disabilities served under this Section. Claims for 11that reimbursement shall be filed by November 1 and shall be 12paid on or before December 15 from appropriations made for the 13purposes of this Section. 14    The State Board of Education shall establish such rules 15and regulations as may be necessary to implement the 16provisions of this Section. 17    Claims filed on behalf of programs operated under this 18Section housed in an orphanage, children's home, private 19facility, State residential unit, district or joint agreement 20site, jail, detention center, or county-owned shelter care 21facility shall be on an individual student basis only for 22eligible students with disabilities. These claims shall be in 23accordance with applicable rules. 24    Each district claiming reimbursement for individual 25students shall have the eligibility of those students verified 26by the State Board of Education. On September 30, December 31,   HB5551 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 20609 LNS 34101 b1and March 31, the State Board of Education shall voucher 2payments for individual students based upon an estimated cost 3calculated from the prior year's claim. Final claims for 4individual students for the regular school term must be 5received at the State Board of Education by June 15. Claims for 6individual students received after June 15 shall not be 7honored. Claims received by June 15 may be amended until 8August 1. Final claims for individual students shall be 9vouchered by August 31. However, notwithstanding any other 10provisions of this Section or this Code, if the amount 11appropriated for any fiscal year is less than the amount 12required for purposes of this Section, the amount required to 13eliminate any insufficient reimbursement for each district 14claim under this Section shall be reimbursed on August 31 of 15the next fiscal year. Payments required to eliminate any 16insufficiency for prior fiscal year claims shall be made 17before any claims are paid for the current fiscal year. 18    Regional superintendents may operate special education 19classes for children from orphanages, foster family homes, 20children's homes, or State residential units located within 21the educational services region upon consent of the school 22board otherwise so obligated. In electing to assume the powers 23and duties of a school district in providing and maintaining 24such a special education program, the regional superintendent 25may enter into joint agreements with other districts and may 26contract with public or private schools or the orphanage,   HB5551 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 20609 LNS 34101 b1foster family home, children's home, or State residential unit 2for provision of the special education program. The regional 3superintendent exercising the powers granted under this 4Section shall be reimbursed for the actual cost of providing 5such programs by the resident district as defined in Section 614-1.11a. 7    Any child who is not a resident of Illinois who is placed 8in a child welfare institution, private facility, foster 9family home, State operated program, orphanage, or children's 10home shall have the payment for his educational tuition and 11any related services assured by the placing agent. 12    For each student with a disability who is placed in a 13residential facility by an Illinois public agency or by any 14court in this State, the costs for educating the student are 15eligible for reimbursement under this Section. 16    The district of residence of the student with a disability 17as defined in Section 14-1.11a is responsible for the actual 18costs of the student's special education program and is 19eligible for reimbursement under this Section when placement 20is made by a State agency or the courts. 21    When a dispute arises over the determination of the 22district of residence under this Section, the district or 23districts may appeal the decision in writing to the State 24Superintendent of Education, who, upon review of materials 25submitted and any other items or information he or she may 26request for submission, shall issue a written decision on the   HB5551 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 20609 LNS 34101 b1matter. The decision of the State Superintendent of Education 2shall be final. 3    In the event a district does not make a tuition payment to 4another district that is providing the special education 5program and services, the State Board of Education shall 6immediately withhold 125% of the then remaining annual tuition 7cost from the State aid or categorical aid payment due to the 8school district that is determined to be the resident school 9district. All funds withheld by the State Board of Education 10shall immediately be forwarded to the school district where 11the student is being served. 12    When a child eligible for services under this Section is 1314-7.03 must be placed in a nonpublic facility, that facility 14shall meet the programmatic requirements of Section 14-7.02 15and its regulations, and the educational services shall be 16funded only in accordance with this Section 14-7.03.17    Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, when a child 18eligible for services under this Section is placed in a 19separate public day school, that school shall meet the 20definition of Section 14-1.08a and the programmatic 21requirements and rules for separate public day schools, and 22the educational services shall be funded only in accordance 23with this Section. 24(Source: P.A. 101-17, eff. 6-14-19.) 25    (105 ILCS 5/21B-70)  HB5551 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 20609 LNS 34101 b1    Sec. 21B-70. Illinois Teaching Excellence Program.2    (a) As used in this Section:3    "Cohort" means a group of candidates for National Board 4certification who are organized for the purpose of 5participating in a structured support program, including 6facilitated professional development, mentoring, and 7collaborative learning. 8    "Diverse candidate" means a candidate who identifies with 9any of the ethnicities reported on the Illinois Report Card 10other than White. 11    "Hard-to-staff school" means a public school that (i) is 12identified as hard to staff based on data reported on its 13school report card under Section 10-17a or (ii) does not have a 14school report card under Section 10-17a but serves a student 15population in which no less than 30% or more of the student 16enrollment is considered low income low-income as determined 17by the State Board of Education using available enrollment or 18funding data reported by the report card under Section 10-17a 19of this Code. 20    "National Board certification" means a voluntary, advanced 21teaching credential that exceeds State licensure requirements 22and is awarded to teachers who meet rigorous national 23standards for accomplished teaching practice established by 24the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards through 25a comprehensive, performance-based assessment process. A 26teacher who holds such certification may be referred to as a   HB5551 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 20609 LNS 34101 b1"National Board certified teacher" under this Section. 2    "National Board certified teacher candidate cohort 3facilitator" means a National Board certified teacher who 4collaborates to advance the goal of supporting all other 5candidate cohorts other than diverse candidate cohorts through 6the Illinois National Board for Professional Teaching 7Standards Comprehensive Support System. 8    "National Board certified teacher diverse candidate cohort 9facilitator" means a National Board certified teacher who 10collaborates to advance the goal of supporting racially and 11ethnically diverse candidates through the Illinois National 12Board for Professional Teaching Standards Comprehensive 13Support System.14    "National Board certified teacher diverse liaison" means 15an individual or entity that supports the National Board 16certified teacher leading a diverse candidate cohort.17    "National Board certified teacher liaison" means an 18individual or entity that supports the National Board 19certified teacher leading candidate cohorts other than diverse 20candidate cohorts. 21    "National Board certified teacher rural or remote or 22distant candidate cohort facilitator" means a National Board 23certified teacher who collaborates to advance the goal of 24supporting rural or remote candidates through the Illinois 25National Board for Professional Teaching Standards 26Comprehensive Support System.   HB5551 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 20609 LNS 34101 b1    "National Board certified teacher rural or remote or 2distant liaison" means an individual or entity that supports 3the National Board certified teacher leading a rural or remote 4candidate cohort. 5    "Qualified educator" means a teacher or school counselor 6currently employed in a school district who is in the process 7of obtaining certification through the National Board for 8Professional Teaching Standards or who has completed 9certification and holds a current Professional Educator 10License with a National Board for Professional Teaching 11Standards designation or a retired teacher or school counselor 12who holds a Professional Educator License with a National 13Board for Professional Teaching Standards designation.14    "Rural or remote" or "rural or remote or distant" means 15local codes 32, 33, 41, 42, and 43 of the New Urban-Centric 16Locale Codes, as defined by the National Center for Education 17Statistics. 18    "School term" means that portion of the school year, from 19July 1 to the following June 30, when school is in actual 20session. 21    "Tier 1" has the meaning given to that term under Section 2218-8.15. 23    "Tier 2" has the meaning given to that term under Section 2418-8.15. 25    (a-5) A regional office of education or intermediate 26service center may establish one cohort per county, except   HB5551 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 20609 LNS 34101 b1that an additional cohort may be established if the number of 2candidates exceeds 20 participants in a single cohort. A 3cohort shall include no more than 20 candidates.4    A school district or individual school may establish a 5cohort if at least 3 candidates are enrolled. The State Board 6of Education or its designee may provide or approve a cohort 7facilitator for a cohort. If a cohort facilitator is not 8available locally, the State Board of Education or its 9designee may (i) provide a facilitator through a virtual 10format or (ii) assign candidates to an existing cohort 11operated by a regional office of education, an intermediate 12service center, or another approved provider, including a 13virtual cohort. 14    (b) Any funds appropriated for the Illinois Teaching 15Excellence Program must be used to provide monetary assistance 16and incentives for qualified educators who are employed by or 17retired from school districts and who have or are in the 18process of obtaining certification licensure through the 19National Board for Professional Teaching Standards and for 20indirect costs necessary for program operations. The goal of 21the program is to improve instruction and student performance.22    The State Board of Education shall allocate an amount as 23annually appropriated by the General Assembly for the Illinois 24Teaching Excellence Program for (i) application or re-take 25fees for each qualified educator seeking to complete 26certification through the National Board for Professional   HB5551 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 20609 LNS 34101 b1Teaching Standards, to be paid directly to the National Board 2for Professional Teaching Standards, and (ii) incentives under 3paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subsection (c) for each 4qualified educator, to be distributed to the respective school 5district, and incentives under paragraph (5) of subsection 6(c), to be distributed to the respective school district or 7directly to the qualified educator. The school district shall 8distribute this payment to each eligible teacher or school 9counselor as a single payment.10    The State Board of Education's annual budget must set out 11by separate line item the appropriation for the program. 12Unless otherwise provided by appropriation, qualified 13educators are eligible for monetary assistance and incentives 14outlined in subsections (c) and (d) of this Section.15    (c) When there are adequate funds available, monetary 16assistance and incentives shall include the following:17        (1) A maximum of $2,000 toward the application or 18    re-take fee for teachers or school counselors in a Tier 1 19    school district who apply on a first-come, first-serve 20    basis for National Board certification.21        (2) A maximum of $2,000 toward the application or 22    re-take fee for teachers or school counselors in a school 23    district other than a Tier 1 school district who apply on a 24    first-come, first-serve basis for National Board 25    certification.26        (3) A maximum of $1,000 toward the National Board for   HB5551 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 20609 LNS 34101 b1    Professional Teaching Standards' renewal application fee.2        (3.5) An annual retention bonus of $4,000 awarded for 3    5 consecutive school years to a National Board certified 4    teacher who is employed in a hard-to-staff school in this 5    State. To be eligible for this retention bonus in a given 6    school year, a National Board certified teacher must (i) 7    be employed on a full-time basis as a teacher or school 8    counselor in a public school in this State for the entire 9    school term, (ii) hold a valid and active certificate 10    issued by the National Board for Professional Teaching 11    Standards, and (iii) be assigned for the full school term 12    to a school designated as hard to staff at the time of 13    initial qualification. A National Board certified teacher 14    who qualifies for this retention bonus remains eligible to 15    receive the bonus for the full 5-year award period, 16    notwithstanding a subsequent change in the school's 17    hard-to-staff designation, as long as the teacher remains 18    continuously employed at the same school or a different 19    hard-to-staff school. Eligibility for this retention bonus 20    terminates if the National Board certified teacher ceases 21    to be employed full time in a public school in this State 22    or accepts employment at a school that is not designated 23    as a hard-to-staff school. The State Board of Education 24    may not deny a National Board certified teacher this 25    retention bonus solely because the public school at which 26    the teacher is employed does not have a school report card   HB5551 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 20609 LNS 34101 b1    under Section 10-17a.2        Retention bonus funds shall be distributed on a 3    first-come, first-served basis. In any fiscal year in 4    which appropriated funds are insufficient to award all 5    eligible National Board certified teachers a retention 6    bonus, those eligible applicants who do not receive a 7    retention bonus shall be given priority consideration for 8    the subsequent fiscal year, in the order of their original 9    application. 10        (4) (Blank).11        (5) An annual incentive of no more than $2,250 12    prorated at $50 per hour, which shall be paid to each 13    qualified educator currently employed in a school district 14    who holds both a National Board for Professional Teaching 15    Standards designation and a current corresponding 16    certificate issued by the National Board for Professional 17    Teaching Standards and who agrees, in writing, to provide 18    up to 45 hours of mentoring or National Board for 19    Professional Teaching Standards professional development 20    or both during the school year to classroom teachers or 21    school counselors, as applicable. Funds must be disbursed 22    on a first-come, first-serve basis, with priority given to 23    Tier 1 school districts. Mentoring shall include, either 24    singly or in combination, the following:25            (A) National Board for Professional Teaching 26        Standards certification candidates.  HB5551 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 20609 LNS 34101 b1            (B) National Board for Professional Teaching 2        Standards re-take candidates.3            (C) National Board for Professional Teaching 4        Standards renewal candidates.5            (D) (Blank).6    Funds may also be used for professional development 7training provided by the National Board Resource Center. 8    Funds may also be used for instructional leadership 9training for qualified educators interested in supporting 10implementation of the Illinois Learning Standards or teaching 11and learning priorities of the State Board of Education or 12both. 13    (d) (Blank). In addition to the monetary assistance and 14incentives provided under subsection (c), if adequate funds 15are available, incentives shall include the following 16incentives for the program in rural or remote schools or 17school districts or for programs working with diverse 18candidates or for retention bonuses for hard-to-staff schools, 19to be distributed to the respective school district or 20directly to the qualified educator or entity: 21        (1) A one-time incentive of $3,000 payable to National 22    Board certified teachers teaching in Tier 1 or Tier 2 23    rural or remote school districts or rural or remote 24    schools in Tier 1 or Tier 2 school districts, with 25    priority given to teachers teaching in Tier 1 rural or 26    remote school districts or rural or remote schools in Tier   HB5551 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 20609 LNS 34101 b1    1 school districts. 2        (2) An annual incentive of $3,200 for National Board 3    certified teacher rural or remote or distant candidate 4    cohort facilitators, diverse candidate cohort 5    facilitators, and candidate cohort facilitators. Priority 6    shall be given to rural or remote candidate cohort 7    facilitators and diverse candidate cohort facilitators. 8        (3) An annual incentive of $2,500 for National Board 9    certified teacher rural or remote or distant liaisons, 10    diverse liaisons, and liaisons. Priority shall be given to 11    rural or remote liaisons and diverse liaisons. 12        (4) An annual retention bonus of $4,000 per year for 2 13    consecutive years shall be awarded to National Board 14    certified teachers employed in hard-to-staff schools. 15    Funds must be disbursed on a first-come, first-served 16    basis.17    (e) Teachers who hold both a National Board for 18Professional Teaching Standards designation and a current 19corresponding certificate issued by the National Board for 20Professional Teaching Standards shall be encouraged to 21participate in other mentoring programs.22    (f) A school district may award lane placement credit on 23the salary schedule to a teacher who is a National Board 24certified teacher or a candidate for National Board 25certification for participation in professional development 26associated with a National Board support program. Such credit   HB5551 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 20609 LNS 34101 b1may be applied toward advancement on the school district's 2salary schedule in accordance with the terms of an applicable 3collective bargaining agreement or district policy.4    (g) The State Board of Education shall report to the 5General Assembly on the available data pertaining to services 6offered, total educator participation and related demographic 7data, recruitment efforts, and program growth and outcomes by 8October 15, 2027. 9(Source: P.A. 103-122, eff. 6-30-23; 103-207, eff. 1-1-24; 10103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.